Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-810
Second or subsequent violations; ouster; injunction.

Any corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association which has been once adjudged to have violated the provisions of sections 59-801 to 59-831 by the final judgment of any court having jurisdiction of the question in any civil suit or proceeding in which such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association was a party, which thereafter violates any of such sections or which fails to make the returns herein required at the times specified shall no longer be allowed to engage in business within this state. Such prohibition shall only be enforced after such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association has been enjoined against further engaging in such business on an information or suit brought in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General in behalf of this state.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 11, p. 640;

R.S.1913, § 4055;

C.S.1922, § 3458;

C.S.1929, § 59-811;

R.S.1943, § 59-810;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 365;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 4.